Hawaii statutes.
[§334-16] Annual report; forensic patient
data. The department of health shall submit an annual report to the
legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular
session which, at a minimum, shall summarize yearly data on forensic patients,
including:

(1) Gross numbers for admissions to and discharges
from the Hawaii state hospital;

(2) The number of admissions to, discharges from, and
lengths of stays in the Hawaii state hospital, broken down by the following
commitment categories:

(A) Original order under section
704-411(1)(a);

(B) Pending examination under section
704-411(3);

(C) Maximum seventy-two-hour recommitment
pending examination under section 704-413(1);

(D) Original order under section 704-404; and

(E) Original order under section 704-406;

(3) Number of persons committed to the Hawaii state hospital by each court and county;

(4) Gross lengths of stay in the Hawaii state
hospital for:

(A) Patients discharged during the fiscal
year; and

(B) Individuals remaining as inpatients at
the end of the fiscal year; and

(5) Number
of patients in the Hawaii state hospital on forensic status, broken down by
categories of underlying crimes, such as by crimes against the person, sex
offenses, and property crimes, and by grade of offense. [L 2008, c 100, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next